Illinois, session 104th, HB3394.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-410 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-410 new)8    Sec. 2105-410. Asynchronous education option. 9    (a) As used in this Section, "asynchronous education" 10means a student-centered teaching method that allows 11applicants to train individually and enables applicants to 12complete courses at a time, place, and pace that suits the 13applicant.14    (b) The Department shall provide an applicant for 15licensure with an asynchronous education or training option 16instead of the current course of education or training 17requirements under each licensing Act administered by the 18Department. The asynchronous education option may be completed 19online. This Section shall not interfere with the provided 20time frame to complete the education or training requirements 21under any licensing Act administered by the Department.22    (c) The Department may adopt rules for the implementation 23of this Section.